Connecticut, session 2026, SB00316.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Notwithstanding any
provision of chapter 277a of the general statutes, any applicant for a
certificate, or petitioner for a declaratory ruling, pursuant to section 16-
50k of the general statutes, for a solar photovoltaic facility with a
capacity of two or more megawatts shall cause a soil test to be conducted
at the proposed location for such facility to determine the presence of
contaminants, including, but not limited to, degraded heavy metals and
toxic substances such as cadmium, lead, arsenic and zinc. The
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection shall prescribe the
parameters and requirements of such soil test and the results of such soil
test shall be submitted by the applicant or petitioner, as applicable, to
the Siting Council and to the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection prior to the issuance of any such certificate or declaratory
ruling and in accordance with any procedures established by the Siting
Council and department for submission of such soil test results. Not
earlier than two years after the construction of any such facility, the
owner or operator of such facility shall cause a second such soil test to
be conducted at the location of such facility. Such second soil test shall
determine the presence of the same contaminants tested for in
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 316
connection with the application for a certificate or petition for a
declaratory ruling for such facility, as applicable. Such second soil test
shall be conducted in accordance with the parameters and requirements
prescribed by the department for such second soil test. The results of
such second soil test shall be submitted by the owner or operator of such
facility to the Siting Council and the department in accordance with any
procedures established by the Siting Council and the department for the
submission of such second soil test results. The cost of any soil test
conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be assumed
by such respective applicant, petitioner, owner or operator.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2